District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.58

Liquidation proceedings — Filing of claims.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 288, Pub. L. 87-569, § 58
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.58.
1981 Ed., § 29-559.
1973 Ed., § 29-1058.